District of Columbia statutes.
19-1304.17

Combination and division of trusts.

After notice to the qualified beneficiaries, a trustee may combine 2 or more trusts into a single trust or divide a trust into 2 or more separate trusts, if the result does not impair rights of any beneficiary or adversely affect achievement of the purposes of the trust.

Mar. 10, 2004, D.C. Law 15-104, § 2(b), 51 DCR 208

History

This section is referenced in § 19-1304.10 and § 19-1305.01.

Section References

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 417 of the Uniform Trust Code.

Editor's Notes